District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

9-113.02

Boundaries of public highways to be permanently marked.

Repealed.

History

R.S., D.C., § 249
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 709, 30 DCR 148

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-105.